src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON NUM_KYMMENEN
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 32
!!€ kymmenen: kymmenen+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ kymmenheen: kymmenen+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ kymmenenä: kymmenen+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ kymmenessä: kymmenen+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ kymmentä: kymmenen+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ kymmenten: kymmenen+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ kymmeniin: kymmenen+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ kymmenhiin: kymmenen+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ kymmenissä: kymmenen+Num+Pl+Ine
!!€ kymmeninä: kymmenen+Num+Pl+Ess
0:en    NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
0:he    NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:e     NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS   ;
0       NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ   ;
0       NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0       NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0       NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IIN   ;
0       NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIIN  ;
0       NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;

LEXICON NUM_SATA
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 9
!!€ sata: sata+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ satana: sata+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ sađassa: sata+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ sathaan: sata+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ sattaa: sata+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ sattoin: sata+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ sathoin: sata+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ sađoissa: sata+Num+Pl+Ine
!!€ satoina: sata+Num+Pl+Ess
0:ta    NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
0:da    NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
0:ta    NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:do    NUM_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:to    NUM_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:ta    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN    ;
0:ta    NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A    ;
0:to    NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA   ;
0:to    NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN   ;
0:ta    NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:to    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

LEXICON NUM_TUHAT
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 46
!!€ tuhat: tuhat+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ tuhantheen: tuhat+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ tuhantena: tuhat+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ tuhannessa: tuhat+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ tuhansien: tuhat+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ tuhatta: tuhat+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ tuhansii: tuhat+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ tuhansiin: tuhat+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ tuhanshiin: tuhat+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ tuhansina: tuhat+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ tuhansissa: tuhat+Num+Pl+Ine
0:t     NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
0:nte   NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:nte   NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:nne   NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:n     NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:t     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA   ;
0:ns    NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA   ;
0:ns    NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:ns    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ns    NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;

LEXICON NUM_MILJOONA
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 10 miljoona
!!€ miljoona: miljoona+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ miljoonana: miljoona+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ miljoonassa: miljoona+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ miljoonaa: miljoona+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ miljoonhaan: miljoona+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ miljoonii: miljoona+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ miljooniitten: miljoona+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ miljoonhiin: miljoona+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ miljoonissa: miljoona+Num+Pl+Ine
!!€ miljoonina: miljoona+Num+Pl+Ess
0:a     NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:a     NUM_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0       NUM_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:ha    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0       NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0       NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:a     NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0       NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIIN   ;


LEXICON NUM_MILJARDI
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 5
!!€ miljardi: miljardi+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ miljardina: miljardi+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ miljardissa: miljardi+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ miljardiina: miljardi+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ miljardiissa: miljardi+Num+Pl+Ine
!!€ miljardii: miljardi+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ miljardhiin: miljardi+Num+Sg+Ill
!!€ miljardii: miljardi+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ miljardiitten: miljardi+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ miljardhiin: miljardi+Num+Pl+Ill
0:i NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
0:i NUM_BACK_SINGULARS   ;
0:e NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;
0:i NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A    ;
0:i NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN    ;
0:e NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA   ;
0:e NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0   NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;


LEXICON NUM_GOOGOL
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 5 more
!!€ Googol: Googol+Num+Sg+Nom
0   NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
0:i NUM_BACK_SINGULARS   ;
0:e NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;
0:i NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A    ;
0:i NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN    ;
0:e NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA   ;
0:e NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0   NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;

LEXICON NUM_PARI
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 5 moremore
!!€ pari: pari+Num+Sg+Nom
!!€ parina: pari+Num+Sg+Ess
!!€ parissa: pari+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ pariissa: pari+Num+Pl+Ine
!!€ pariina: pari+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ parrii: pari+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ parrii: pari+Num+Pl+Par
!!€ parriin: pari+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ parhiin: pari+Num+Pl+Ill
!!€ parhiin: pari+Num+Sg+Ill
0:i     NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:i     NUM_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:e     NUM_BACK_PLURALS   ;
0:i     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:i     NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:e     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0       NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:e     NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;


LEXICON NUM_ENSIMMÄINEN
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 38
!!€ ensimmäinen: ensimmäinen+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom
!!€ ensimmäisenä: ensimmäinen+Num+Ord+Sg+Ess
!!€ ensimmäisessä: ensimmäinen+Num+Ord+Sg+Ine
!!€ ensimmäistä: ensimmäinen+Num+Ord+Sg+Par
!!€ ensimmäisten: ensimmäinen+Num+Ord+Pl+Gen
!!€ ensimmäissii: ensimmäinen+Num+Ord+Pl+Par
!!€ ensimmäishiin: ensimmäinen+Num+Ord+Pl+Ill
!!€ ensimmäisinä: ensimmäinen+Num+Ord+Pl+Ess
!!€ ensimmäisissä: ensimmäinen+Num+Ord+Pl+Ine
0:nen   NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
0:se    NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:se    NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS   ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ   ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ   ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;
+Der+Der/s:s    R ; !new PoS is missing

LEXICON NUM_TOINEN
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 38 back
!!€ toinen: toinen+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom
!!€ toisheen: toinen+Num+Ord+Sg+Ill
!!€ toista: toinen+Num+Ord+Sg+Par
!!€ toisten: toinen+Num+Ord+Pl+Gen
!!€ toissiin: toinen+Num+Ord+Pl+Gen
!!€ toissii: toinen+Num+Ord+Pl+Par
!!€ toishiin: toinen+Num+Ord+Pl+Ill
!!€ toisena: toinen+Num+Ord+Sg+Ess
!!€ toisessa: toinen+Num+Ord+Sg+Ine
!!€ toisissa: toinen+Num+Ord+Pl+Ine
!!€ toisina: toinen+Num+Ord+Pl+Ess
0:nen   NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
0:she    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:se    NUM_BACK_SINGULARS   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;
+Der+Der/s:s    R ; !new PoS is missing

LEXICON NUM_KOLMAS
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 45
!!€ kolmas: kolmas+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom
!!€ kolmantena: kolmas+Num+Ord+Sg+Ess
!!€ kolmanessa: kolmas+Num+Ord+Sg+Ine
!!€ kolmantheen: kolmas+Num+Ord+Sg+Ill
!!€ kolmatta: kolmas+Num+Ord+Sg+Par
!!€ kolmanssii: kolmas+Num+Ord+Pl+Par
!!€ kolmanssiin: kolmas+Num+Ord+Pl+Gen
!!€ kolmansissa: kolmas+Num+Ord+Pl+Ine
!!€ kolmansina: kolmas+Num+Ord+Pl+Ess
0:s     NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
0:nte   NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:nte   NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:nne   NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:t     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA   ;
0:ns    NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA   ;
0:ns    NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:ns    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ns    NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;

LEXICON NUM_NELJÄS
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 45 fron
!!€ neljes: neljäs+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom
!!€ neljentheen: neljäs+Num+Ord+Sg+Ill
!!€ neljentenä: neljäs+Num+Ord+Sg+Ess
!!€ neljennessä: neljäs+Num+Ord+Sg+Ine
!!€ neljettä: neljäs+Num+Ord+Sg+Par
!!€ neljenssii: neljäs+Num+Ord+Pl+Par
!!€ neljenssiin: neljäs+Num+Ord+Pl+Gen
!!€ neljenshiin: neljäs+Num+Ord+Pl+Ill
!!€ neljensissä: neljäs+Num+Ord+Pl+Ine
!!€ neljensinä: neljäs+Num+Ord+Pl+Ess
0:s     NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
0:nte   NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:nte   NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:nne   NUM_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:t     NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ   ;
0:ns    NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ   ;
0:ns    NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:ns    NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ns    NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;











! Arabic numerals
! ---------------

LEXICON NUM_CARD_ALL
kymmenen+Num:kymmen    NUM_KYMMENEN ;
sata+Num:sa            NUM_SATA ;
tuhat+Num:tuha         NUM_TUHAT ;
miljoona+Num:miljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
miljardi+Num:miljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
biljoona+Num:biljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
biljardi+Num:biljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
triljoona+Num:triljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
triljardi+Num:triljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
kvadriljoona+Num:kvadriljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
kvadriljardi+Num:kvadriljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
kvintiljoona+Num:kvintiljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
kvintiljardi+Num:kvintiljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
sekstiljoona+Num:sekstiljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
sekstiljardi+Num:sekstiljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
oktiljoona+Num:oktiljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
oktiljardi+Num:oktiljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
noviljoona+Num:noviljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
noviljardi+Num:noviljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
undekiljoona+Num:undekiljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
undekiljardi+Num:undekiljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
duodekiljoona+Num:duodekiljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
duodekiljardi+Num:duodekiljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
tredekiljoona+Num:tredekiljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
tredekiljardi+Num:tredekiljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
kvattuordekiljoona+Num:kvattuordekiljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
kvattuordekiljardi+Num:kvattuordekiljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
kvindekiljoona+Num:kvindekiljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
kvindekiljardi+Num:kvindekiljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
sedekiljoona+Num:sedekiljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
sedekiljardi+Num:sedekiljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
septendekiljoona+Num:septendekiljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
septendekiljardi+Num:septendekiljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
oktodekiljoona+Num:oktodekiljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
oktodekiljardi+Num:oktodekiljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
novemdekiljoona+Num:novemdekiljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
novemdekiljardi+Num:novemdekiljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
vidingtiljoona+Num:vidingtiljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
vidingtiljardi+Num:vidingtiljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
tridingtiljoona+Num:tridingtiljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
tridingtiljardi+Num:tridingtiljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
sentiljoona+Num:sentiljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
sentiljardi+Num:sentiljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
kiljoona+Num:kiljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
kiljardi+Num:kiljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
piljoona+Num:piljoon  NUM_MILJOONA ;
piljardi+Num:piljard  NUM_MILJARDI ;
Googol+Num:Googol          NUM_GOOGOL  ;
Googolplex+Num:Googolplex  NUM_GOOGOL  ;
LEXICON NUM_ORD_ALL
ensimmäinen+Num+Ord:ensimmäi    NUM_ENSIMMÄINEN ;
yhdes+Num+Ord:yhde              NUM_NELJÄS ;
toinen+Num+Ord:toi              NUM_TOINEN ;
kolmas+Num+Ord:kolma            NUM_KOLMAS ;
neljäs+Num+Ord:neljä            NUM_NELJÄS ;
viides+Num+Ord:viide            NUM_NELJÄS ;
kuudes+Num+Ord:kuude            NUM_KOLMAS ;
seitsemäs+Num+Ord:seitsemä      NUM_NELJÄS ;
kahdeksas+Num+Ord:kahdeksa      NUM_KOLMAS ;
yhdeksäs+Num+Ord:yhdeksä        NUM_NELJÄS ;
kymmenes+Num+Ord:kymmene        NUM_NELJÄS ;
sadas+Num+Ord:sada              NUM_KOLMAS ;
tuhannes+Num+Ord:tuhanne        NUM_KOLMAS ;
miljoonas+Num+Ord:miljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
miljardis+Num+Ord:miljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
biljoonas+Num+Ord:biljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
biljardis+Num+Ord:biljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
triljoonas+Num+Ord:triljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
triljardis+Num+Ord:triljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
kvadriljoonas+Num+Ord:kvadriljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
kvadriljardis+Num+Ord:kvadriljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
kvintiljoonas+Num+Ord:kvintiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
kvintiljardis+Num+Ord:kvintiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
sekstiljoonas+Num+Ord:sekstiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
sekstiljardis+Num+Ord:sekstiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
oktiljoonas+Num+Ord:oktiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
oktiljardis+Num+Ord:oktiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
noviljoonas+Num+Ord:noviljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
noviljardis+Num+Ord:noviljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
undekiljoonas+Num+Ord:undekiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
undekiljardis+Num+Ord:undekiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
duodekiljoonas+Num+Ord:duodekiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
duodekiljardis+Num+Ord:duodekiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
tredekiljoonas+Num+Ord:tredekiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
tredekiljardis+Num+Ord:tredekiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
kvattuordekiljoonas+Num+Ord:kvattuordekiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
kvattuordekiljardis+Num+Ord:kvattuordekiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
kvindekiljoonas+Num+Ord:kvindekiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
kvindekiljardis+Num+Ord:kvindekiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
sedekiljoonas+Num+Ord:sedekiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
sedekiljardis+Num+Ord:sedekiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
septendekiljoonas+Num+Ord:septendekiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
septendekiljardis+Num+Ord:septendekiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
oktodekiljoonas+Num+Ord:oktodekiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
novemdekiljoonas+Num+Ord:novemdekiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
vidingtiljoonas+Num+Ord:vidingtiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
tridingtiljoonas+Num+Ord:tridingtiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
sentiljoonas+Num+Ord:sentiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
kiljoonas+Num+Ord:kiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
piljoonas+Num+Ord:piljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
